Utah statutes.
32A-11-103.   Qualifications.
(1) (a)  The commission may not issue a beer wholesaling license to any person
who has been convicted of:
(i)  a felony under any federal or state law;
(ii)  any violation of any federal or state law or local ordinance concerning
the sale, manufacture, distribution, warehousing, adulteration, or
transportation of alcoholic products;
(iii)  any crime involving moral turpitude; or
(iv)  on two or more occasions within the five years before the day on which
the license is granted, driving under the influence of alcohol, any drug, or
the combined influence of alcohol and any drug.
(b)  In the case of a partnership, corporation, or limited liability company,
the proscription under Subsection (1)(a) applies if any of the following has
been convicted of any offense described in Subsection (1)(a):
(i)  a  partner;
(ii)  a managing agent;
(iii) a manager;
(iv)  an officer;
(v)  a director;
(vi)  a stockholder who holds at least 20% of the total issued and outstanding
stock of the applicant corporation; or
(vii)  a member who owns at least 20% of the applicant limited liability
company.
(c)  The proscription under Subsection (1)(a) applies if any person employed
to act in a supervisory or managerial capacity for the wholesaler has been
convicted of any offense as provided in Subsection (1)(a).
(2)  The commission may immediately suspend or revoke a beer wholesaling
license if after the day on which the beer wholesaling license is granted, a
person described in Subsection (1)(a), (b), or (c):
(a)  is found to have been convicted of any offense described in Subsection
(1)(a) prior to the license being granted; or
(b)  on or after the day on which the license is granted:
(i)  is convicted of an offense described in Subsection (1)(a)(i), (ii), or
(iii); or
(ii) (A)  is convicted of driving under the influence of alcohol, any drug, or
the combined influence of alcohol and any drug; and
(B)  was convicted of driving under the influence of alcohol, any drug, or the
combined influence of alcohol and any drug within five years before the day on
which the person is convicted of the offense described in Subsection
(2)(b)(ii)(A).
(3)  The director may take emergency action by immediately suspending the
operation of a beer wholesaling license according to the procedures and
requirements of Title 63G, Chapter 4, Administrative Procedures Act, for the
period during which the criminal matter is being adjudicated if a person
described in Subsection (1)(a), (b), or (c):
(a)  is arrested on a charge for an offense described in Subsection (1)(a)(i),
(ii), or (iii); or
(b) (i)  is arrested on a charge for the offense of driving under the
influence of alcohol, any drug, or the combined influence of alcohol and any
drug; and
(ii)  was convicted of driving under the influence of alcohol, any drug, or
the combined influence of alcohol and any drug within five years before the
day on which the person is arrested on a charge described in Subsection
(3)(b)(i).
(4) (a) (i)  The commission may not grant a beer wholesaling license to any
person who has had any type of license, agency, or permit issued under this
title revoked within the last three years.
(ii)  The commission may not grant a beer wholesaling license to an applicant
that is a partnership, corporation, or limited liability company if any
partner, managing agent, manager, officer, director, stockholder who holds at
least 20% of the total issued and outstanding stock of the applicant
corporation, or member who owns at least 20% of the applicant limited
liability company is or was:
(A)  a partner or managing agent of any partnership that had any type of
license, agency, or permit issued under this title revoked within the last
three years;
(B)  a managing agent, officer, director, or stockholder who holds or held at
least 20% of the total issued and outstanding stock of any corporation that
had any type of license, agency, or permit issued under this title revoked
within the last three years; or
(C)  a manager or member who owns or owned at least 20% of any limited
liability company that had any type of license, agency, or permit issued under
this title revoked within the last three years.
(b)  An applicant that is a partnership, corporation, or limited liability
company may not be granted a beer wholesaling license if any of the following
had any type of license, agency, or permit issued under this title revoked
while acting in that person's individual capacity within the last three years:
(i)  a partner or managing agent of the applicant partnership;
(ii)  any managing agent, officer, director, or stockholder who holds at least
20% of the total issued and outstanding stock of the applicant corporation; or
(iii)  any manager or member who owns at least 20% of the applicant limited
liability company.
(c)  A person acting in an individual capacity may not be granted a beer
wholesaling license if that person was:
(i)  a partner or managing agent of a partnership that had any type of
license, agency, or permit issued under this title revoked within the last
three years;
(ii)  a managing agent, officer, director, or stockholder who held at least
20% of the total issued and outstanding stock of a corporation that had any
type of license, agency, or permit issued under this title revoked within the
last three years; or
(iii)  a manager or member who owned at least 20% of the limited liability
company that had any type of license, agency, or permit issued under this
title revoked within the last three years.
(5) (a)  A minor may not be:
(i)  granted a beer wholesaling license; or
(ii)  employed by a licensee to handle beer.
(b)  The commission may not grant a beer wholesaling license to an applicant
that is a partnership, corporation, or limited liability company if any of the
following is a minor:
(i)  a partner or managing agent of the applicant partnership;
(ii)  a managing agent, officer, director, or stockholder who holds at least
20% of the total issued and outstanding stock of the applicant corporation; or
(iii)  a manager or member who owns at least 20% of the applicant limited
liability company.
(6) (a)  A beer wholesaler may not be issued, directly or indirectly, nor
hold, through any wholly or partially owned subsidiaries or otherwise, a
brewery license or a retail beer license simultaneously with a wholesaling
license.
(b)  A retail beer licensee may not be issued, directly or indirectly, nor
hold, through any wholly or partially owned subsidiaries or otherwise, a
wholesaling license.
(7)  The commission may not grant a beer wholesaling license to any person who
has not met any applicable federal requirements for beer wholesaling.
(8)  If any person to whom a license has been issued under this chapter no
longer possesses the qualifications required by this title for obtaining that
license, the commission may suspend or revoke that license.
